District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1403

Establishment of the District of Columbia Sports and Entertainment Commission.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 4, 41 DCR 4636
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-246, § 8(b), 42 DCR 452
June 6, 1998, D.C. Law 12-115, § 2, 45 DCR 1957
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2082(j), 57 DCR 181

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-4003.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 8 (b) of the Recreation Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-20, February 28, 1995, 42 DCR 1175).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Transfer of Functions

Transfer of nonmilitary functions to Sports Commission: Section 19 of D.C. Law 10-152, provided, in part, that the Sports Commission shall assume all nonmilitary functions of the Armory Board as are set forth in § 2-306 repealed and that all references to the Armory Board in subchapter II of Chapter 3 of Title 2 subchapter II of Chapter 3 of Title 3, 2001 Ed. are intended to be references to the Sports Commission unless the clear meaning requires otherwise.

Editor's Notes

Construction of Law 10-152: See note to § 3-1401.

Annual reports of Sports Commission: Section 20 of D.C. Law 10-152 provided that the Sports Commission shall file with the Mayor and the Council each year a financial statement relating to the activities and business of the Sports Commission during the preceding fiscal year certified as to accuracy by an independent auditor.

Section 2 of D.C. Law 10-206 amended § 19 of D.C. Law 10-152 by adding (e) and (f) which contain provisions authorizing the Armory Board to exercise its nonmilitary functions and authority on an interim basis and ratifying actions taken by the Board during the interim period.

For temporary amendment of D.C. Law 10-152, authorizing the Armory Board to exercise its nonmilitary functions and authority on an interim basis, see § 2 of the Armory Board Interim Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-325, October 14, 1994, 41 DCR 7027) and § 2 of the Armory Board Interim Authority Congressional Adjournment Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-5, January 19, 1995, 42 DCR 545).

Title of land and improvements acquired by Commission: Section 601(g) of D.C. Law 10-188 provided that all land and improvements on the land acquired by the Sports Commission shall be held in the name of the Sports Commission except that title to the property shall not be transferred by the Sports Commission to any person or entity other than the District of Columbia government.